Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6242.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43528. (1) An individual shall not hunt bear unless the individual possesses a bear hunting license. However, an individual who goes on a bear hunt with a licensed hunter is not required to possess a bear hunting license if the individual does not carry a firearm, bow, or crossbow and does not own dogs used to chase or locate bear during the hunt. Beginning March 1, 2014, only Only an individual holding a valid base license is eligible to purchase a bear hunting license, pursuant to current regulations. (2) The fee for a resident bear hunting license is $15.00. The fee for a nonresident bear hunting license is $150.00. Beginning March 1, 2014, the fee for a bear hunting license is $25.00. (3) The department may issue a kill tag with, or as a part of, a bear hunting license. The kill tag shall must bear the license number. The kill tag may also include space for other pertinent information required by the department. The kill tag, if issued, is part of the license. (4) In addition to the license fees in subsection (2), the department shall charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $4.00 for each individual who applies for a bear hunting license. Beginning March 1, 2014, in addition to the license fees in subsection (2), the department shall charge a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed $5.00 for each individual who applies for a bear hunting license. (5) Beginning March 1, 2014, the The following individuals chasing or locating bear with dogs during the open season for that game and who hold a valid base license are eligible for the purchase of a bear participation license for a fee of $15.00: (a) Any individual possessing a firearm, crossbow, or bow and arrow. (b) The owner, when present, of any dog chasing or locating bear. (6) An individual shall not use a barrel to bait bear without first obtaining a bear bait barrel permit from the department. An individual is authorized to obtain only 1 bear bait barrel permit annually from the department. The fee for a bear bait barrel permit is $30.00. A bear bait barrel permit authorizes the permittee to use no more than 3 barrels total to bait bear. The permittee may place and maintain up to 3 barrels at 1 bear baiting site, or the permittee may place and maintain individual barrels at up to 3 different bear baiting sites. (7) A barrel used under a bear bait barrel permit must meet all of the following: (a) Be constructed of steel. (b) Not exceed 55 gallons in capacity. (c) Be equipped with a bolt-secured top or lid. (d) Have no more than 3 openings, each opening not exceeding 1 inch in diameter. (e) Be anchored to the ground by a chain and stake. (f) Have 1 of the following: (i) A bear bait barrel permit affixed to the barrel while the barrel is in use. (ii) The name and address of the permittee and the permit number permanently painted or printed directly on the barrel in clearly legible characters. (g) Be removed no later than 30 days after the end of bear season. (8) The department may promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, that govern the placement, maintenance, and use of barrels under a bear bait barrel permit. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Bait" means food, food waste, or other organic material placed in a barrel at a bear baiting site to attract bear. (b) "Barrel" means a steel cylindrical container used to hold bait at a bear baiting site. (c) "Bear baiting site" means a location where a barrel is placed or maintained for the purpose of attracting bear for taking under a bear bait barrel permit issued under subsection (6).